District of Columbia statutes.
13-424

Service outside the District of Columbia.

When the exercise of personal jurisdiction is authorized by this subchapter, service may be made outside the District of Columbia.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 549, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 132(a)
1981 Ed., § 13-424.
1973 Ed., § 13-424.